Idaho statutes. Title 46 MILITIA AND MILITARY AFFAIRS
Chapter 11 IDAHO CODE OF MILITARY JUSTICE
The appellate review of records of trial provided by this code, the proceedings, findings, and sentences of courts-martial as approved, reviewed, or affirmed as required by this code, and all dismissals and discharges carried into execution under sentences by courts-martial following approval, review, or affirmation as required by this code are final and conclusive. Orders publishing the proceedings of courts-martial and all action taken pursuant to those proceedings are binding upon all departments, courts, agencies, and officers of the United States and the several states, subject only to action upon a petition for a new trial as provided in article 73 of this code and to action under article 74 of this code.

ARTICLE 76A. LEAVE REQUIRED TO BE TAKEN PENDING REVIEW OF CERTAIN COURT-MARTIAL CONVICTIONS

Under regulations prescribed, an accused who has been sentenced by a court-martial may be required to take leave pending completion of action under this article if the sentence, as approved under article 60 of this code, includes an unsuspended dismissal or an unsuspended dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge. The accused may be required to begin such leave on the date on which the sentence is approved under article 60 of this code or at any time after such date, and such leave may be continued until the date on which action under this article is completed or may be terminated at any earlier time.

ARTICLE 76b. RESERVED

PART X. PUNITIVE ARTICLES

ARTICLE 77. PRINCIPALS

Any person subject to this code who:

Commits an offense punishable by this code, or aids, abets, counsels, commands, or procures its commission; or

Causes an act to be done which if directly performed by him would be punishable by this code;

is a principal.

ARTICLE 78. ACCESSORY AFTER THE FACT

Any person subject to this code who, knowing that an offense punishable by this code has been committed, receives, comforts, or assists the offender in order to hinder or prevent his apprehension, trial, or punishment shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 79. CONVICTION OF OFFENSE CHARGED, LESSER INCLUDED OFFENSES, AND ATTEMPTS

In general. An accused may be found guilty of any of the following:

The offense charged;

A lesser included offense;

An attempt to commit the offense charged; or

An attempt to commit a lesser included offense, if the attempt is an offense in its own right.

Definition. In this article, the term “lesser included offense” means:

An offense that is necessarily included in the offense charged; and

Any lesser included offense so designated by regulation prescribed by the adjutant general.

Regulatory authority. Any designation of a lesser included offense in a regulation referred to in subsection (b) of this article shall be reasonably included in the greater offense.

ARTICLE 80. ATTEMPTS

An act done with specific intent to commit an offense under this code amounting to more than mere preparation and tending, even though failing, to effect its commission, is an attempt to commit that offense.

Any person subject to this code who attempts to commit any offense punishable by this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct, unless otherwise specifically prescribed.

Any person subject to this code may be convicted of an attempt to commit an offense although it appears on the trial that the offense was consummated.

ARTICLE 81. CONSPIRACY

Any person subject to this code who conspires with any other person to commit an offense under this code shall, if one (1) or more of the conspirators commits an act to effect the object of the conspiracy, be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 82. SOLICITATION

Soliciting commission of offenses generally. Any person subject to this code who solicits or advises another to commit an offense under this code, other than an offense specified in subsection (b) of this article, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Soliciting desertion, mutiny, sedition, or misbehavior before the enemy. Any person subject to this code who solicits or advises another to violate article 85, article 94, or article 99:

If the offense solicited or advised is attempted or is committed, shall be punished with the punishment provided for the commission of the offense; and

If the offense solicited or advised is not attempted or committed, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 83. MALINGERING

Any person subject to this code who, for the purpose of avoiding work, duty, or service, feigns illness, physical disablement, mental lapse, or derangement, or who intentionally inflicts self-injury, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 84. BREACH OF MEDICAL QUARANTINE

Any person subject to this code who is ordered into medical quarantine by a person authorized to issue such order and who, with knowledge of the quarantine and the limits of the quarantine, goes beyond those limits before being released from the quarantine by proper authority shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 85. DESERTION

Any member of the state military forces who:

Without authority goes or remains absent from his unit, organization, or place of duty with intent to remain away there from permanently;

Quits his unit, organization, or place of duty with intent to avoid hazardous duty or to shirk important service; or

Without being regularly separated from one of the state military forces enlists or accepts an appointment in the same or another one of the state military forces, or in one of the armed forces of the United States, without fully disclosing the fact that he has not been regularly separated, or enters any foreign armed service except when authorized by the United States;

Any commissioned officer of the state military forces who, after tender of his resignation and before notice of its acceptance, quits his post or proper duties without leave and with intent to remain away there from permanently is guilty of desertion.

Any person found guilty of desertion or attempt to desert shall be punished, if the offense is committed in time of war, by confinement of not more than ten (10) years or such other punishment as a court-martial may direct, but if the desertion or attempt to desert occurs at any other time, by such punishment as a court-martial may direct.

is guilty of desertion.

ARTICLE 86. ABSENCE WITHOUT LEAVE

Any person subject to this code who, without authority:

Fails to go to his appointed place of duty at the time prescribed;

Goes from that place; or
(3) Absents himself or remains absent from his unit, organization, or place of duty at which he is required to be at the time prescribed;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 87. MISSING MOVEMENT

Any person subject to this code who through neglect or design misses the movement of a ship, aircraft, or unit with which he is required in the course of duty to move shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 87A. RESISTANCE, FLIGHT, BREACH OF ARREST, AND ESCAPE

Any person subject to this code who resists apprehension, flees from apprehension, breaks arrest, or escapes from custody or confinement shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 87B. OFFENSES AGAINST CORRECTIONAL CUSTODY AND RESTRICTION

Escape from correctional custody. Any person subject to this code:

Who is placed in correctional custody by a person authorized to do so;

Who, while in correctional custody, is under physical restraint; and

Who escapes from the physical restraint before being released from the physical restraint by proper authority;

Breach of correctional custody. Any person subject to this code:

Who is placed in correctional custody by a person authorized to do so;

Who, while in correctional custody, is under restraint other than physical restraint; and

Who goes beyond the limits of the restraint before being released from the correctional custody or relieved of the restraint by proper authority;

Breach of restriction. Any person subject to this code:

Who is ordered to be restricted to certain limits by a person authorized to do so; and

Who, with knowledge of the limits of the restriction, goes beyond those limits before being released by proper authority;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 88. CONTEMPT TOWARD OFFICIALS

Any commissioned officer who uses contemptuous words against the president, the vice president, congress, the secretary of defense, the secretary of a military department, the secretary of homeland security, or the governor or legislature of the state shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 89. DISRESPECT TOWARD SUPERIOR COMMISSIONED OFFICER

Disrespect. Any person subject to this code who behaves with disrespect toward that person’s superior commissioned officer shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Assault. Any person subject to this code who strikes that person’s superior commissioned officer or draws or lifts up any weapon or offers any violence against that officer while the officer is in the execution of the officer’s office shall be punished: if the offense is committed in time of war, by confinement of not more than ten (10) years or such other punishment as a court-martial may direct; and, if the offense is committed at any other time, by such punishment as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 90. ASSAULTING OR WILLFULLY DISOBEYING SUPERIOR COMMISSIONED OFFICER

Any person subject to this code who:

Strikes his superior commissioned officer or draws or lifts up any weapon or offers any violence against him while he is in the execution of his office; or

Willfully disobeys a lawful command of his superior commissioned officer;

shall be punished, if the offense is committed in time of war, by confinement of not more than ten (10) years or such other punishment as a court-martial may direct, and if the offense is committed at any other time, by such punishment as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 91. INSUBORDINATE CONDUCT TOWARD WARRANT OFFICER, NONCOMMISSIONED OFFICER OR PETTY OFFICER

Any warrant officer or enlisted member who:

Strikes or assaults a warrant officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer, while that officer is in the execution of his office;

Willfully disobeys the lawful order of a warrant officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer; or

Treats with contempt or is disrespectful in language or deportment toward a warrant officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer, while that officer is in the execution of his office;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 92. FAILURE TO OBEY ORDER OR REGULATION

Any person subject to this code who:

Violates or fails to obey any lawful general order or regulation;

Having knowledge of any other lawful order issued by a member of the state military forces, which it is his duty to obey, fails to obey the order; or

Is derelict in the performance of his duties;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 93. CRUELTY AND MALTREATMENT

Any person subject to this code who is guilty of cruelty toward, or oppression or maltreatment of, any person subject to his orders shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 93A. PROHIBITED ACTIVITY WITH MILITARY RECRUIT OR TRAINEE BY PERSON IN POSITION OF SPECIAL TRUST

Abuse of training leadership position. Any person subject to this code:

Who is an officer or a noncommissioned officer;

Who is in a training leadership position with respect to a specially protected junior member of the state military forces; and

Who engages in prohibited sexual activity with such specially protected junior member of the state military forces;
shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Abuse of position as military recruiter. Any person subject to this code:

Who is a military recruiter and engages in prohibited sexual activity with an applicant for state military service; or

Who is a military recruiter and engages in prohibited sexual activity with a specially protected junior member of the state military forces who is enlisted under a delayed entry program;

Consent. Consent is not a defense for any conduct at issue in a prosecution under this article.

Definitions. In this article:

“Specially protected junior member of the state military forces” means:

A member of the state military forces who is assigned to, or is awaiting assignment to, basic training or other initial training, including a member who is enlisted under a delayed entry program;

A member of the state military forces who is a cadet, an officer candidate, or a student in any other officer qualification program; and

A member of the state military forces in any program that, by regulation prescribed by the secretary concerned, is identified as a training program for initial career qualification.

“Training leadership position” means, with respect to a specially protected junior member of the state military forces, any instructor position or other leadership position in a basic training program, an officer candidate school, a reserve officers’ training corps unit (ROTC), a training program for entry into the state military forces, or any program that, by regulation prescribed by the secretary concerned, is identified as a training program for initial career qualification.

“Applicant for state military service” means a person who, under the regulations prescribed by the secretary concerned, is an applicant for original enlistment or appointment in the state military forces.

“Military recruiter” means a person who, under regulation prescribed by the secretary concerned, has the primary duty to recruit persons for the state military forces.

“Prohibited sexual activity” means, as specified in the regulations prescribed by the governor or his designated representative, inappropriate physical intimacy under circumstances described in such regulations.

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 94. MUTINY OR SEDITION

Any person subject to this code who:

With intent to usurp or override lawful military authority, refuses, in concert with any other person, to obey orders or otherwise do his duty or creates any violence or disturbance is guilty of mutiny;

With intent to cause the overthrow or destruction of lawful civil authority, creates, in concert with any other person, revolt, violence, or other disturbance against that authority is guilty of sedition;

Fails to do his utmost to prevent and suppress a mutiny or sedition being committed in his presence, or fails to take all reasonable means to inform his superior commissioned officer or commanding officer of a mutiny or sedition which he knows or has reason to believe is taking place, is guilty of a failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition.
(b) A person who is found guilty of attempted mutiny, mutiny, sedition, or failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 95. OFFENSES BY SENTINEL OR LOOKOUT

Drunk or sleeping on post, or leaving post before being relieved. Any sentinel or lookout who is drunk on post, who sleeps on post, or who leaves post before being regularly relieved shall be punished:

If the offense is committed in time of war, by confinement of not more than ten (10) years or other punishment as a court-martial may direct; and

If the offense is committed at any other time, by such punishment as a court-martial may direct.

Loitering or wrongfully sitting on post. Any sentinel or lookout who loiters or wrongfully sits down on post shall be punished as a court-marital may direct.

ARTICLE 95A. DISRESPECT TOWARD SENTINEL OR LOOKOUT

Disrespectful language toward sentinel or lookout. Any person subject to this code who, knowing that another person is a sentinel or lookout, uses wrongful and disrespectful language that is directed toward and within the hearing of the sentinel or lookout who is in the execution of duties as a sentinel or lookout shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Disrespectful behavior toward sentinel or lookout. Any person subject to this code who, knowing that another person is a sentinel or lookout, behaves in a wrongful and disrespectful manner that is directed toward and within the sight of the sentinel or lookout who is in the execution of duties as a sentinel or lookout shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 96. RELEASING PRISONER WITHOUT PROPER AUTHORITY — DRINKING WITH PRISONER

Any person subject to this code who, without proper authority, releases any prisoner committed to his charge, or who through neglect or design suffers any such prisoner to escape, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct, whether or not the prisoner was committed in strict compliance with law.

Drinking with prisoner. Any person subject to this code who unlawfully drinks any alcoholic beverage with a prisoner shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 97. UNLAWFUL DETENTION

Any person subject to this code who, except as provided by law or regulation, apprehends, arrests, or confines any person shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 98. MISCONDUCT AS PRISONER

Any person subject to this code who:

For the purpose of securing favorable treatment by his captors, acts without proper authority in a manner contrary to law, custom, or regulation, to the detriment of others of whatever nationality held by the enemy as civilian or military prisoners; or

While in a position of authority over such persons maltreats them without justifiable cause;

Through disobedience, neglect, or intentional misconduct endangers the safety of any such command, unit, place, or military property;

Casts away his arms or ammunition;

Is guilty of cowardly conduct;

Quits his place of duty to plunder or pillage;

Causes false alarms in any command, unit, or place under control of the armed forces of the United States or the state military forces;

Willfully fails to do his utmost to encounter, engage, capture, or destroy any enemy troops, combatants, vessels, aircraft, or any other thing, which it is his duty so to encounter, engage, capture, or destroy; or

Does not afford all practicable relief and assistance to any troops, combatants, vessels, or aircraft of the armed forces belonging to the United States or its allies, to the state, or to any other state, when engaged in battle;

ARTICLE 100. SUBORDINATE COMPELLING SURRENDER

Any person subject to this code who compels or attempts to compel the commander of any of the state military forces of the state, or of any other state, place, vessel, aircraft, or other military property, or of any body of members of the armed forces, to give it up to an enemy or to abandon it, or who strikes the colors or flag to an enemy without proper authority, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 101. IMPROPER USE OF COUNTERSIGN

Any person subject to this code who in time of war discloses the parole or countersign to any person not entitled to receive it or who gives to another, who is entitled to receive and use the parole or countersign, a different parole or countersign from that which, to his knowledge, he was authorized and required to give, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 102. FORCING A SAFEGUARD

Any person subject to this code who forces a safeguard shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 103. CAPTURED OR ABANDONED PROPERTY

All persons subject to this code shall secure all public property taken for the service of the United States or the state and shall give notice and turn over to the proper authority without delay all captured or abandoned property in their possession, custody, or control.

Any person subject to this code who:

Fails to carry out the duties prescribed in subsection (a) of this article;

Buys, sells, trades, or in any way deals in or disposes of taken, captured, or abandoned property, whereby he receives or expects any profit, benefit, or advantage to himself or another directly or indirectly connected with himself; or
(3) Engages in looting or pillaging;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 103A. SPIES — RESERVED

ARTICLE 103B. ESPIONAGE — RESERVED

ARTICLE 103C. AIDING THE ENEMY

Any person subject to this code who:

Aids, or attempts to aid, the enemy with arms, ammunition, supplies, money, or other things; or

Without proper authority, knowingly harbors or protects or gives intelligence to, or communicates or corresponds with or holds any intercourse with the enemy, either directly or indirectly;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 104. PUBLIC RECORD OFFENSES

Any person subject to this code who, willfully and unlawfully:

Alters, conceals, removes, mutilates, obliterates, or destroys a public record; or

Takes a public record with the intent to alter, conceal, remove, mutilate, obliterate, or destroy the public record;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 104A. FRAUDULENT ENLISTMENT, APPOINTMENT, OR SEPARATION

Any person who:

Procures his own enlistment or appointment in the state military forces by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to his qualifications for that enlistment or appointment and receives pay or allowances thereunder; or

Procures his own separation from the state military forces by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to his eligibility for that separation;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 104B. UNLAWFUL ENLISTMENT, APPOINTMENT, OR SEPARATION

Any person subject to this code who effects an enlistment or appointment in or a separation from the state military forces of any person who is known to him to be ineligible for that enlistment, appointment, or separation because it is prohibited by law, regulation, or order shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 105. RESERVED

ARTICLE 105A. FALSE OR UNAUTHORIZED PASS OFFENSES

Wrongful making, altering, counterfeiting, tampering. Any person subject to this code who, wrongfully and falsely, makes, alters, counterfeits, or tampers with a military or official pass, permit, discharge certificate, or identification card shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Wrongful sale, etc. Any person subject to this code who wrongfully sells, gives, lends, or disposes of a false or unauthorized military or official pass, permit, discharge certificate, or identification card, knowing that the pass, permit, discharge certificate, or identification card is false or unauthorized, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Wrongful use or possession. Any person subject to this code who wrongfully uses or possesses a false or unauthorized military or official pass, permit, discharge certificate, or identification card, knowing that the pass, permit, discharge certificate, or identification card is false or unauthorized, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 106. IMPERSONATION OF AN OFFICER, NONCOMMISSIONED OR PETTY OFFICER, OR AGENT OR OFFICIAL

In general. Any person subject to this code who, wrongfully and willfully, impersonates:

An officer, a noncommissioned officer, or a petty officer;

An agent of superior authority of one of the armed forces; or

An officer of a government;

Impersonation with intent to defraud. Any person subject to this code who, wrongfully and willfully and with intent to defraud, impersonates any person referred to in subsection (1) of this article shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Impersonation of government official without intent to defraud. Any person subject to this code who, wrongfully and willfully and without intent to defraud, impersonates an official of a government by committing an act that exercises or asserts the authority of the office that the person claims to have shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 106A. WEARING UNAUTHORIZED INSIGNIA, DECORATION, BADGE, RIBBON, DEVICE, OR LAPEL BUTTON

Any person subject to this code:

Who is not authorized to wear an insignia, decoration, badge, ribbon, device, or lapel button; and

Who wrongfully wears such insignia, decoration, badge, ribbon, device, or lapel button upon the person’s uniform or civilian clothing;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 107. FALSE OFFICIAL STATEMENTS

False official statements. Any person subject to this code who, with intent to deceive:

Signs any false record, return, regulation, order, or other official document in the line of duty, knowing it to be false; or

Makes any other false official statement in the line of duty, knowing it to be false;

False swearing. Any person subject to this code:

Who is on military orders;

Who takes an oath that:

Is administered in a manner in which such oath is required or authorized by law; and

Is administered by a person with authority to do so; and
(c) Who, upon such oath, makes or subscribes to a statement, if the statement is false and at the time of taking the oath the person does not believe the statement to be true, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Who, having been a prisoner as the result of a court-martial conviction or other criminal proceeding, is on parole with conditions; and

Who violates the conditions of parole;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 107a. PAROLE VIOLATION

Any person subject to this code:

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 108. MILITARY PROPERTY — LOSS, DAMAGE, DESTRUCTION OR WRONGFUL DISPOSITION

Any person subject to this code who, without proper authority:

Sells or otherwise disposes of;

Willfully or through neglect damages, destroys, or loses; or

Willfully or through neglect suffers to be lost, damaged, destroyed, sold, or wrongfully disposed of;

any military property of the United States or of any state shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 108A. CAPTURED OR ABANDONED PROPERTY

All persons subject to this code shall secure all public property taken for the service of the United States, or the state, and shall give notice and turn over to the proper authority without delay all captured or abandoned property in their possession, custody, or control.

Any person subject to this code who:

Fails to carry out the duties prescribed in subsection (1) of this article;

Buys, sells, trades, or in any way deals in or disposes of taken, captured, or abandoned property, whereby he receives or expects any profit, benefit, or advantage to himself or another directly or indirectly connected with himself; or

Engages in looting or pillaging;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 109. PROPERTY OTHER THAN MILITARY PROPERTY — WASTE, SPOILAGE OR DESTRUCTION

Any person subject to this code who willfully or recklessly wastes, spoils, or otherwise willfully and wrongfully destroys or damages any property other than military property of the United States or of any state shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 109a. MAIL MATTER — WRONGFUL TAKING, OPENING

Taking. Any person subject to this code who, with the intent to obstruct the correspondence of, or to pry into the business or secrets of, any person or organization, while on military duty, wrongfully takes mail matter before the mail matter is delivered to or received by the addressee shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Opening, secreting, destroying, stealing. Any person subject to this code who, while on military duty, wrongfully opens, secretes, destroys, or steals mail matter before the mail matter is delivered to or received by the addressee shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 110. IMPROPER HAZARDING OF VESSEL OR AIRCRAFT

Willful and wrongful hazarding. Any person subject to this code who willfully and wrongfully hazards or suffers to be hazarded any vessel or aircraft of the armed forces of the United States or any state military forces shall suffer such punishment as a court-martial may direct.

Negligent hazarding. Any person subject to this code who negligently hazards or suffers to be hazarded any vessel or aircraft of the armed forces of the United States or any state military forces shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 111. LEAVING SCENE OF A VEHICLE ACCIDENT

Driver. Any person on state military orders:

Who is the driver of a vehicle that is involved in an accident that results in personal injury or property damage; and

Who wrongfully leaves the scene of the accident;

Who, without providing assistance to an injured person; or

Who, without providing personal identification to others involved in the accident or to appropriate authorities;

Senior passenger. Any person subject to this code:

Who is passenger in a vehicle that is involved in an accident that results in personal injury or property damage;

Who is the superior commissioned or noncommissioned officer of the driver of the vehicle or is the commander of the vehicle; and

Who wrongfully and unlawfully orders, causes, or permits the driver to leave the scene of the accident;

Without providing assistance to an injured person; or

Without providing personal identification to others involved in the accident or to appropriate authorities;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 112. DRUNKENNESS AND OTHER INCAPACITATION OFFENSES

Drunk on duty. Any person subject to this code who is drunk on duty shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Incapacitation for duty from drunkenness or drug use. Any person subject to this code who, as a result of indulgence in any alcoholic beverage or any drug, is incapacitated for the proper performance of duty shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Drunk prisoner. Any person subject to this code who is a prisoner and, while in such status, is drunk shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Definitions. “Drunk” means any intoxication sufficient to impair the rational and full exercise of the mental or physical faculties, or an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more as shown by an analysis of the person’s blood, breath, or urine subject to the testing standards within title 18, Idaho Code. “Incapacitated” means unfit or unable to perform duties properly as a result of prior alcohol consumption.
(5) Testing. Commanders may order the person to provide a breath, blood, or urine sample if the commander has probable cause to believe that the person is drunk or incapacitated while on duty. Testing under this article will be performed by a peace officer, hospital, or health care professional in the jurisdiction in which a violation of this article has occurred. No military member, peace officer, hospital, or heath care professional, as defined in title 18, Idaho Code, shall incur any civil or criminal liability for any act arising out of administering an evidentiary test for alcohol concentration or for the presence of drugs or other intoxicating substances at the request of a commander. In the event a person ordered to provide a breath, blood, or urine sample refuses to do so, that person may be punished for violating a lawful order as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 112A. WRONGFUL USE, POSSESSION, ETC., OF CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES

Any person subject to this code who wrongfully uses, possesses, manufactures, distributes, imports into the customs territory of the United States, exports from the United States, or introduces into an installation, vessel, vehicle, or aircraft used by or under the control of the armed forces of the United States or of any state military forces a substance described in subsection (b) of this article shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

The substances referred to in subsection (a) of this article are the following:

Opium, heroin, cocaine, amphetamine, lysergic acid diethylamide, methamphetamine, phencyclidine, barbituric acid, and marijuana and any compound or derivative of any such substance.

Any substance not specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection that is listed on a schedule of controlled substances prescribed by the president for the purposes of the uniform code of military justice of the armed forces of the United States, 10 U.S.C. 801 et seq.

Any other substance not specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection or contained on a list prescribed by the president under paragraph (2) of this subsection that is listed in schedules I through V of article 202 of the controlled substances act, 21 U.S.C. 812.

ARTICLE 113. RESERVED

ARTICLE 114. ENDANGERMENT OFFENSES

Reckless endangerment. Any person subject to this code who engages in conduct that:

Is wrongful and reckless or is wanton; and

Is likely to produce death or grievous bodily harm to another person;

Dueling. Any person subject to this code:

Who fights or promotes, or is concerned in or connives at fighting, a duel; or

Who, having knowledge of a challenge sent or about to be sent, fails to report the fact promptly to the proper authority;

Firearm discharge, endangering human life. Any person subject to this code who negligently discharges a firearm under circumstances such as to endanger human life shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Carrying concealed weapon. Any person subject to this chapter who, while on military orders, unlawfully or in violation of the adjutant general’s policy or regulation, carries a dangerous weapon concealed on or about his person shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 115. COMMUNICATING THREATS

Communicating threats generally. Any person subject to this code who wrongfully communicates a threat to injure the person, property, or reputation of another shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Communicating threat to use explosive, etc. Any person subject to this code who wrongfully communicates a threat to injure the person or property of another by use of:

An explosive;

A weapon of mass destruction;

A biological or chemical agent, substance, or weapon; or

A hazardous material;

Communicating false threat concerning use of explosive, etc. Any person subject to this code who maliciously communicates a false threat concerning injury to the person or property of another by use of:

An explosive;

A weapon of mass destruction;

A biological or chemical agent, substance, or weapon; or

A hazardous material;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct. The term “false threat” as used in this subsection means a threat that, at the time the threat is communicated, is known to be false by the person communicating the threat.

ARTICLE 116. RIOT OR BREACH OF PEACE

Any person subject to this code who causes or participates in any riot or breach of the peace shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 117. PROVOKING SPEECHES OR GESTURES

Any person subject to this code who uses provoking or reproachful words or gestures towards any other person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 118. RESERVED

ARTICLE 119. RESERVED

ARTICLE 120. RESERVED

ARTICLE 121. RESERVED

ARTICLE 122. RESERVED

ARTICLE 123. OFFENSES CONCERNING GOVERNMENT COMPUTERS

In general. Any person subject to this chapter who:

Knowingly accesses a government computer, with an unauthorized purpose, and by doing so obtains classified information, with reason to believe such information could be used to the injury of the United States or the state, or to the advantage of any foreign nation, and intentionally communicates, delivers, transmits, or causes to be communicated, delivered, or transmitted such information to any person not entitled to receive it;

Intentionally accesses a government computer, with an unauthorized purpose, and thereby obtains classified or other protected information from any such government computer; or

Knowingly causes the transmission of a program, information, code, or command and, as a result of such conduct, intentionally causes damage without authorization to a government computer;

Definition. In this article, the term “government computer” means a computer owned or operated by or on behalf of the United States government or state.

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 123A. RESERVED

ARTICLE 124. RESERVED

ARTICLE 124A. BRIBERY

Asking for, accepting, or receiving a thing of value. Any person subject to this code:

Who occupies an official position or who has official duties with the state military forces; and

Who wrongfully asks, accepts, or receives a thing of value with the intent to have the person’s decisions or actions influenced with respect to an official matter in which the United States or the state is interested;

Promising, offering, or giving a thing of value. Any person subject to this code who wrongfully promises, offers, or gives a thing of value to another person who occupies an official position or who has official duties with the state military forces, with the intent to influence the decision or action of another person with respect to an official matter in which the United States or the state is interested, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 124B. GRAFT

Asking for, accepting, or receiving a thing of value. Any person subject to this code:

Who occupies an official position or who has official duties with the state military forces; and

Who wrongfully asks, accepts, or receives a thing of value as compensation for or in recognition of services rendered or to be rendered by the person with respect to an official matter in which the United States or the state is interested;

Promising, offering, or giving a thing of value. Any person subject to this code who wrongfully promises, offers, or gives a thing of value to another person who occupies an official position or who has official duties with the state military forces, as compensation for or in recognition of services rendered or to be rendered by the other person with respect to an official matter in which the United States or the state is interested, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 125. RESERVED

ARTICLE 126. RESERVED

ARTICLE 127. RESERVED

ARTICLE 128. RESERVED

ARTICLE 129. RESERVED

ARTICLE 130. RESERVED

ARTICLE 131. RESERVED

ARTICLE 131B. OBSTRUCTING JUSTICE

Any person subject to this code who engages in conduct in the case of a certain person against whom the accused had reason to believe there were or would be criminal or disciplinary proceedings pending pursuant to this code, with intent to influence, impede, or otherwise obstruct the due administration of justice, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 131C. MISPRISION OF A SERIOUS OFFENSE

In general. Any person subject to this code:

Who knows that another person has committed a serious offense; and

Who wrongfully conceals the commission of the offense and fails to make the commission of the offense known to civilian or military authorities as soon as possible;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

ARTICLE 131D. WRONGFUL REFUSAL TO TESTIFY
